Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 16

Landlord and Tenant

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Cross References.

Contracts for lease of lands or tenements for more than one year must be written, §4-59-101.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1901, No. 122, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 2009, No. 815, § 3: Apr. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the traditional deadline for notice of the termination of a lease for the next crop year is June 30; that farmers operating under an oral lease are currently vulnerable to a demand for the surrender of their land; that the certainty of a farm lease of lands is necessary before the purchase of seed, fertilizer, equipment replacement, determination of the amount of a production loan, and advanced planning required for farming operations; and that this act will provide the necessary certainty to permit efficient farming operations. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

18-16-101. Failure to pay rent — Refusal to vacate upon notice — Penalty.

(a)

Any person who shall rent any dwelling house or other building or any land situated in the State of Arkansas and who shall refuse or fail to pay the rent therefor when due according to contract shall at once forfeit all right to longer occupy the dwelling house or other building or land.

(b)(1)

If, after ten (10) days' notice in writing shall have been given by the landlord or the landlord's agent or attorney to the tenant to vacate the dwelling house or other building or land, the tenant shall willfully refuse to vacate and surrender the possession of the premises to the landlord or the landlord's agent or attorney, the tenant shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2)(A)

Upon conviction before any justice of the peace or other court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the premises are situated, the tenant shall be fined in any sum not less than one dollar ($1.00) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each offense.

(B)

Each day the tenant shall willfully and unnecessarily hold the dwelling house or other building or land after the expiration of notice to vacate shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1901, No. 122, § 1, p. 193; C. & M. Dig., § 6569; Acts 1937, No. 129, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8599; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-523; Acts 2001, No. 1733, § 1; 2017, No. 159, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 159, § 1, provided: “Findings and legislative intent.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

The decision of the United States Court of Appeals, Eighth Circuit, in Munson v. Gilliam, 543 F.2d 48 (8th Cir. 1976), and the decision of the Arkansas Supreme Court in Duhon v. State, 299 Ark. 503, 774 S.W.2d 830 (Ark. 1989), upheld the constitutionality of Ark Code §18-16-101;

“(2)

The General Assembly amended Ark. Code §18-16-101 in 2001;

“(3)

In January 2015, the Circuit Court of Pulaski County, in State of Arkansas v. Artoria Smith, Case No. CR 2014-2707, ruled that Ark. Code §18-16-101, as amended, is unconstitutional; and

“(4)

It is in the best interests of the people of the State of
Arkansas for property owners to continue to have remedies against tenants who fail to pay rent for a dwelling house or other building but refuse to surrender possession of the dwelling house or other building.

“(b)

It is the intent of the General Assembly by this act to amend Ark. Code §18-16-101 so that the language of Ark. Code §18-16-101 is exactly as was previously in effect when Ark. Code § 18-16-101 was upheld as constitutional in the Munson and Duhon decisions, and to eliminate the amendments to Ark. Code Ann. § 18-16-101 that were found to be unconstitutional in the Smith decision.”

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment, in (b), deleted “in any sum not less than one dollar ($1.00) nor more than” preceding “twenty-five dollars ($25.00),” and substituted “per day for … the premises” for “for each offense. Each day the tenant shall willfully and unnecessarily hold the dwelling house or other building or land after the expiration of notice to vacate shall constitute a separate offense”; added (c); and made gender neutral and grammatical changes throughout.

The 2017 amendment redesignated (b)(2) as (b)(2)(A); substituted “in any sum not less than one dollar ($1.00) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each offense” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day for each day that the tenant fails to vacate the premises for each offense”; added (b)(2)(B); and deleted (c).

Cross References.

Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

Parties.

Where the two owners of undivided interests in land contracted with a third party, also owner of an undivided interest, to lease lands to the third party, one owner-lessor could not procure a cancellation of the lease for failure to pay rent by the third party without joining the other owner-lessor in the proceeding. La Fargue v. La Fargue, 210 Ark. 97, 194 S.W.2d 438 (1946).

18-16-102, 18-16-103. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning lessee unlawfully collecting from subtenant, penalty and rent collection by personal representative of life tenant, were repealed by Acts 2007, No. 1004, §§
2, 3. The sections were derived from the following sources:

18-16-102. Acts 1883, No. 21, § 1, p. 32; 1893, No. 131, § 1, p. 228; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6894-6896; Pope's Dig., §§ 8850-8852; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-521, 50-522.

18-16-103. Rev. Stat., ch. 88, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 6549; Pope's Dig., § 8579; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-501.

18-16-104. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the penalty for enticing a renter away, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 560. The section was derived from Acts 1883, No. 96, § 8, p. 176; 1905, No. 298, § 1, p. 726; C. & M. Dig., § 6570; Acts 1923 (1st. Ex. Sess.), No. 34, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8600; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-524.

18-16-105. Termination of oral lease of farmlands.

The owner of farmlands that are rented or leased under an oral rental or lease agreement may elect not to renew the oral rental or lease agreement for the following calendar year by giving written notice by certified mail to the renter or lessee on or before June 30 that the oral rental or lease agreement will not be renewed for the following calendar year.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 190, § 1; 2009, No. 815, §§ 1, 2.

Publisher's Notes.

Former §18-16-105, concerning termination of oral lease of farmlands, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 1004, §
4. The section was derived from the following sources: Acts 1981, No. 866, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-531.

18-16-106, 18-16-107. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning holding over after termination of term, and failure to quit after notice of intention, were repealed by Acts 2007, No. 1004, §§
5-6. The sections were derived from the following sources:

18-16-106. Rev. Stat., ch. 88, §§ 9, 10; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6557, 6558; Pope's Dig., §§ 8587, 8588; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-509, 50-510.

18-16-107. Rev. Stat., ch. 88, §§ 7, 8; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6555, 6556; Pope's Dig., §§ 8585, 8586; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-507, 50-508.

18-16-108. Property left on premises after termination of lease.

(a)

Upon the voluntary or involuntary termination of any lease agreement, all property left in and about the premises by the lessee shall be considered abandoned and may be disposed of by the lessor as the lessor shall see fit without recourse by the lessee.

(b)

All property placed on the premises by the tenant or lessee is subject to a lien in favor of the lessor for the payment of all sums agreed to be paid by the lessee.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 577, § 2.

Cross References.

Landlord's liens, §18-41-101 et seq.

18-16-109. [Transferred.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

This section has been renumbered as §18-28-101.

18-16-110. Landlord's liability arising from alleged defects or disrepair of premises.

No landlord or agent or employee of a landlord shall be liable to a tenant or a tenant's licensee or invitee for death, personal injury, or property damage proximately caused by any defect or disrepair on the premises absent the landlord's:

(1)

Agreement supported by consideration or assumption by conduct of a duty to undertake an obligation to maintain or repair the leased premises; and

(2)

Failure to perform the agreement or assumed duty in a reasonable manner.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 928, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 928, § 1 provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that the Arkansas Supreme Court has requested its guidance regarding the law pertaining to a landlord's liability to tenants and tenants' licensees and invitees for death, injuries, or property damage suffered on the leased premises that are proximately caused by defects or disrepair on the premises.

“(b)

As the Supreme Court recognized in Thomas v. Stewart, 347 Ark. 33, 60 S.W.3d 415 (2001) and Probst v. McNeill, 326 Ark. 623, 932 S.W.2d 766 (1996), for more than a century, Arkansas law has adhered to the common law principle under which a landlord has no liability to a tenant or tenant's guests absent the landlord's:

“(1)

Agreement supported by consideration or assumption by conduct of a duty to undertake repair and maintenance; and

“(2)

Failure to perform the agreement or assumed duty in a reasonable manner.

“(c)(1)

The General Assembly further finds that the Supreme Court has properly and correctly interpreted and applied the law and that existing law should not be altered or extended.

“(2)

The purpose and intent of Section 2 of this act is to codify this rule of law as it exists under Arkansas common law.”

18-16-111. Manufactured homes and mobile homes on leased land — Definitions.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Lessee” means the person or persons leasing the property, site, or lot where a manufactured home or mobile home is located;

(2)

“Lessor” means the owner or manager of the property, site, or lot where a manufactured home or mobile home is located; and

(3)

“Unoccupied” means that a manufactured home or mobile home has ceased to be a customary place of habitation or abode and no person is living or residing in it.

(b)(1)

When a manufactured home or mobile home on a leased site is unoccupied and the lease or rental payment for the leased site where the mobile home or manufactured home is located is sixty (60) days or more past due, the lessor shall notify the lessee and the lienholder, if the lienholder is not the lessee or occupant of the manufactured home or mobile home, that the manufactured home or mobile home is unoccupied and that the lease or rental payment is past due.

(2)

The notice shall be in writing and delivered by certified mail and shall include the following information if known or readily available to the lessor:

(A)

The lessor's name and mailing address;

(B)

The lessee's name and last known mailing address;

(C)

The lienholder's name and mailing address;

(D)

The street address or physical location of the manufactured home or mobile home;

(E)

The monthly lease payment amount;

(F)

The serial number of the manufactured home or mobile home; and

(G)

A description of the manufactured home or mobile home, including the make, model, year, dimensions, and any identification numbers or marks.

(3)

In the notice required in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the lessor shall notify the lienholder that unless the manufactured home or mobile home is removed from the leased site within thirty (30) days from the date the lienholder receives the notice, the manufactured home or mobile home shall be subject to a lien in favor of the lessor for the payment of all lease or rental payments accruing from the date the lienholder received the notice.

(c)(1)

Unless the lienholder is prevented by law from removing the manufactured home or mobile home, the lienholder has thirty (30) days to remove the manufactured home or mobile home before the lienholder shall be held responsible for lease or rental payments accruing from the date the lienholder received the notice.

(2)

If the lienholder fails to remove the manufactured home or mobile home within thirty (30) days, the manufactured home or mobile home shall be subject to a lien in favor of the lessor for the payment of all lease or rental payments beginning on the date that the notice is received by the lienholder in an amount equal to the monthly lease or rental payments contained in the notice.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall obligate the lienholder for any lease or rental payments owed while the lessee occupied the manufactured home or mobile home or any other lease or rental payments due prior to the notification of the lienholder, as required by subsection (b) of this section.

(e)

Nothing in this section shall prevent the lessor from holding the lessee responsible for any unpaid lease or rental payments.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2228, § 1.

18-16-112. Protection for victims of domestic abuse — Definitions.

(a)

As used in this section:

(1)

“Documented incident of domestic abuse” means evidence of domestic abuse contained in an order of a court of competent jurisdiction;

(2)

“Domestic abuse” means:

(A)

The infliction of physical injury or the creation of a reasonable fear that physical injury or harm will be inflicted upon a member of a household by a member or former member of the household; or

(B)

The commission of a sex crime or act of stalking upon a member of a household;

(3)

“Domestic abuse offender” means a person identified in a documented incident of domestic abuse as performing any act of domestic abuse;

(4)

“Sex crime” includes without limitation:

(A)

The following offenses:

(i)

Rape, §5-14-103;

(ii)

Sexual indecency with a child, §5-14-110;

(iii)

Sexual assault in the first degree, §5-14-124;

(iv)

Sexual assault in the second degree, §5-14-125;

(v)

Sexual assault in the third degree, §5-14-126;

(vi)

Sexual assault in the fourth degree, §5-14-127;

(vii)

Incest, §5-26-202;

(viii)

Engaging children in sexually explicit conduct for use in visual or print medium, §5-27-303;

(ix)

Transportation of minors for prohibited sexual conduct, §5-27-305;

(x)

Employing or consenting to the use of a child in a sexual performance, §5-27-402;

(xi)

Pandering or possessing visual or print medium depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child, §5-27-304;

(xii)

Producing, directing, or promoting a sexual performance by a child, §5-27-403;

(xiii)

Promoting prostitution in the first degree, §5-70-104;

(xiv)

Indecent exposure, §5-14-112, if a felony level offense;

(xv)

Exposing another person to human immunodeficiency virus when a person who has tested positive for human immunodeficiency virus was ordered by the sentencing court to register as a sex offender, §5-14-123;

(xvi)

Kidnapping pursuant to §5-11-102(a) when the victim is a minor and the offender is not the parent of the victim;

(xvii)

False imprisonment in the first degree and false imprisonment in the second degree, §§5-11-103 and5-11-104, when the victim is a minor and the offender is not the parent of the victim;

(xviii)

Permitting abuse of a minor pursuant to §5-27-221;

(xix)

Computer child pornography, §5-27-603;

(xx)

Computer exploitation of a child, §5-27-605;

(xxi)

Permanent detention or restraint when the offender is not the parent of the victim, §5-11-106; and

(xxii)

Distributing, possessing, or viewing matter depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child, §5-27-602;

(B)

An attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit any offense enumerated in subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this section; and

(C)

An adjudication of guilt for an offense of the law of another state, for a federal offense, for a tribal court offense, or for a military offense:

(i)

That is similar to any offense enumerated in subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this section; or

(ii)

When that adjudication of guilt requires registration under another state's sex offender registration laws;

(5)

“Stalking” means following or loitering near a person with the purpose of annoying, harassing, or committing an assault or battery against the person; and

(6)

“Victim of domestic abuse” means a person or a member of the person's household who is identified in a documented incident of domestic abuse within:

(A)

The immediately preceding sixty (60) days; or

(B)

Sixty (60) days of the termination of a residential tenancy by the person, a member of the person's household, or landlord because of domestic abuse.

(b)

If a residential tenant, an applicant for a residential tenancy, or a member of the tenant or applicant's household is a victim of domestic abuse as evidenced by a documented incident of domestic abuse:

(1)

With respect to the victim of domestic abuse, a landlord shall not terminate or fail to renew a residential tenancy, refuse to enter into a residential tenancy, or otherwise retaliate in the leasing of a residence because of the domestic abuse; and

(2)(A)

At the residential tenant's expense and with the landlord's prior consent, a landlord or a residential tenant other than a domestic abuse offender may change the locks to the residential tenant's residence.

(B)

The landlord or residential tenant shall furnish the other a copy of the new key to the residential tenant's residence immediately after changing the locks or as soon after changing the locks as possible if either the landlord or residential tenant is unavailable.

(c)

Notwithstanding a conflicting provision in a domestic abuse offender's residential tenancy agreement, if a domestic abuse offender is under a court order to stay away from a co-tenant residing in the domestic abuser's offender's residence or the co-tenant's residence:

(1)

The domestic abuse offender under the court order may access either residence only to the extent permitted by the court order or another court order;

(2)

A landlord may refuse access by a domestic abuse offender to the residence of a victim of domestic abuse unless the domestic offender is permitted access by court order; and

(3)

A landlord may pursue all available legal remedies against the domestic abuse offender, including without limitation an action:

(A)

To terminate the residential tenancy agreement of the domestic abuse offender;

(B)

To evict the domestic abuse offender whether or not a residential tenancy agreement between the landlord and domestic abuse offender exists; and

(C)

For damages against the domestic abuse offender:

(i)

For any unpaid rent owed by the domestic abuse offender; and

(ii)

Resulting from a documented incident of domestic abuse.

(d)

A landlord is entitled to a court order terminating the residential tenancy agreement of a person or evicting a person, or both, under subdivision (c)(3)(A) or (c)(3)(B) of this section upon proof that the person is a domestic abuse offender under this section.

(e)

A landlord is immune from civil liability if the landlord in good faith:

(1)

Changes the locks under subdivision (b)(2) of this section; or

(2)

Acts in accordance with a court order under subsection (c) of this section.

(f)

A residential tenant may not waive in a residential tenancy the residential tenant's right to request law enforcement assistance or other emergency assistance.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 682, § 1; 2009, No. 482, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “§5-27-605” for “in the first degree, §5-27-605(a)” in (a)(4)(A)(xx); deleted (a)(4)(A)(xxiii), which read: “Computer child pornography, §5-27-603”; deleted (a)(4)(A)(xxiv), which read: “Computer exploitation of a child, §5-27-605”; and made related changes.

18-16-113. Hunting and fishing rights — Leased farmland.

(a)(1)

A tenant of leased or rented farmland shall have no right to hunt or fish or grant the right to hunt or fish on the farmland that he or she leases or rents unless the right to hunt or fish or to grant the right to hunt or fish is expressly granted in writing by the owner of the farmland.

(2)

The right to hunt or fish or to grant the right to hunt or fish on farmland shall reside solely with the owner of the farmland.

(b)

The farmland owner's right to hunt or fish on his or her farmland includes without limitation the right to:

(1)

Travel by foot or by any type of vehicle or boat, and by any means on, over, across, and through the farmland, and by any roads, waterways, ditches, levies, rights of way, or easements on or appurtenant to the farmland;

(2)

Move, remove, use, pump, or impound water on, upon, and about the farmland;

(3)

Erect, maintain, and operate permanent or temporary structures, facilities, utilities, pumping systems, blinds, docks, decks, and other similar structures and facilities on the farmland; and

(4)

Grant other persons, natural or artificial, the right, concurrently or exclusively, to engage in and undertake any manner or means of hunting or fishing on, upon, and about the farmland that is leased or rented, whether orally or in writing, and to exercise any and all of the foregoing rights attendant thereto.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 869, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Actions Against Tenants

18-16-201 — 18-16-205. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning ejectment for nonpayment of rent, duty of tenant to notify landlord, actions for use and occupation, remedy when lease for life, and recovery of rent in arrears due decedent, were repealed by Acts 2007, No. 1004, §§
7-11. The sections were derived from the following sources:

18-16-201. Rev. Stat., ch. 88, §§ 15-21; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6562-6568; Pope's Dig., §§ 8592-8598; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-514 – 50-520.

18-16-202. Rev. Stat., ch. 88, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 6554; Pope's Dig., § 8584; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-506.

18-16-203. Rev. Stat., ch. 88, §§ 11-13; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6559-6561; Pope's Dig., §§ 8589-8591; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-511 – 50-513.

18-16-204. Rev. Stat., ch. 88, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 6552; Pope's Dig., § 8582; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-504.

18-16-205. Rev. Stat., ch. 88, §§ 2, 3, 5; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6550, 6551, 6553; Pope's Dig., §§ 8580, 8581, 8583; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 50-502, 50-503, 50-505.

Subchapter 3

— Security Deposits

18-16-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Dwelling unit” means a structure or the part of the structure that is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one (1) person who maintains a household or by two (2) or more persons who maintain a common household;

(2)

“Landlord” means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the dwelling unit or the building of which it is a part;

(3)

“Owner” means one (1) or more persons, jointly or severally, in whom is vested:

(A)

All or part of the legal title to property; or

(B)

All or part of the beneficial ownership and a right to present use and enjoyment of the premises. The term includes a mortgagor in possession;

(4)

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, association, or other organization;

(5)

“Premises” means a dwelling unit and the structure of which it is a part and facilities and appurtenances therein and grounds, areas, and facilities held out for the use of tenants generally or whose use is promised to the tenant;

(6)

“Rent” means all payments to be made to the landlord under the rental agreement;

(7)

“Rental agreement” means all written or oral agreements and valid rules embodying the terms and conditions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit and premises; and

(8)

“Tenant” means a person entitled under a rental agreement to occupy a dwelling unit to the exclusion of others.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 531, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-525; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 1688.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (7).

18-16-302. Transferee, etc., bound.

The transferee, assignee, or other holder of the landlord's interest in the premises at the time of the termination of the tenancy is bound by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 531, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-529.

18-16-303. Exemptions.

(a)

This subchapter shall not apply to dwelling units owned by an individual, if the individual, his or her spouse and minor children, and any and all partnerships, corporations, or other legal entities formed for the purpose of renting dwelling units and of which they are officers, owners, or majority shareholders own, or collectively own, five (5) or fewer dwelling units.

(b)

This exemption does not apply to units for which management, including rent collection, is performed by third persons for a fee.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 531, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-530.

18-16-304. Maximum amount.

A landlord may not demand or receive a security deposit, however denominated, in an amount or value in excess of two (2) months periodic rent.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 531, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-526.

18-16-305. Refund required — Exceptions.

(a)(1)

Within sixty (60) days of termination of the tenancy, property or money held by the landlord as security shall be returned to the tenant.

(2)

However, the money may be applied to the payment of accrued unpaid rent and any damages which the landlord has suffered by reason of the tenant's noncompliance with the rental agreement, all as itemized by the landlord in a written notice delivered to the tenant, together with the remainder of the amount due sixty (60) days after termination of the tenancy and delivery of possession by the tenant.

(b)(1)

The landlord shall be deemed to have complied with subsection (a) of this section by mailing via first class mail the written notice and any payment required to the last known address of the tenant.

(2)

If the letter containing the payment is returned to the landlord and if the landlord is unable to locate the tenant after reasonable effort, then the payment shall become the property of the landlord one hundred eighty (180) days from the date the payment was mailed.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 531, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-527; Acts 2009, No. 559, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “sixty (60)” for “thirty (30)” in (a)(1) and (a)(2).

18-16-306. Remedies.

(a)(1)

If the landlord fails to comply with this subchapter, the tenant may recover:

(A)

The property and money due him or her;

(B)

Damages in an amount equal to two (2) times the amount wrongfully withheld;

(C)

Costs; and

(D)

Reasonable attorney's fees.

(2)

However, the landlord shall be liable only for costs and the sum erroneously withheld if the landlord shows by the preponderance of the evidence that his or her noncompliance:

(A)

Resulted from an error which occurred despite the existence of procedures reasonably designed to avoid such errors; or

(B)

Was based on a good faith dispute as to the amount due.

(b)

This section does not preclude the landlord or tenant from any other relief to which either may be lawfully entitled.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 531, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-528.

Subchapter 4

— Self-Service Storage Facilities

Effective Dates.

Acts 2017, No. 738, § 2: Mar. 29, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current law concerning the sale of a vehicle by a self-service storage facility does not authorize the issuance of a new certificate of title to the vehicle purchaser and, accordingly, self-service storage facilities are unable to sell abandoned vehicles resulting in irreparable harm to these businesses by causing a loss of income and storage space; and that this act is immediately necessary to allow the sale of abandoned vehicles. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

18-16-401. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Default” means the failure to timely perform an obligation of a rental agreement;

(2)

“Electronic mail” means an electronic message, a file, data, or other information that is transmitted:

(A)

Between two (2) or more computers, computer networks, or electronic terminals; or

(B)

Within or between computer networks;

(3)

“Electronic mail address” means a destination commonly expressed as a string of characters to which electronic mail may be sent or delivered;

(4)

“Last known address” means the address or electronic mail address provided by the occupant in:

(A)

The rental agreement; or

(B)

A subsequent written notice of a change of address;

(5)

“Leased space” means individual storage space at a self-service storage facility that is rented to an occupant under a rental agreement;

(6)

“Net proceeds” means the proceeds from the sale authorized upon a default under this subchapter after deduction for:

(A)

Expenses incurred by the operator to exercise its rights under this subchapter, including without limitation attorney's fees, auctioneers' fees, postage, and publication costs;

(B)

The debt owed by the occupant to the operator for leased space; and

(C)

Charges related to preserving, assembling, advertising, and selling personal property under this subchapter;

(7)

“Occupant” means a person or entity entitled to the use of leased space at a self-service storage facility under a rental agreement;

(8)(A)

“Operator” means:

(i)

The owner, operator, lessor, or sublessor of a self-service storage facility;

(ii)

An agent of the owner operator, lessor, or sublessor of a self-service storage facility; or

(iii)

Any other person authorized to manage a self-service storage facility.

(B)

“Operator” does not include a warehouseman, unless the operator issues a warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or other document of title for storing personal property;

(9)(A)

“Personal property” means movable property not affixed to land.

(B)

“Personal property” includes without limitation goods, wares, merchandise, motor vehicles, watercraft, and household items and furnishings;

(10)

“Rental agreement” means a written agreement that establishes or modifies the terms, conditions, or rules concerning the use and occupancy of a self-service storage facility; and

(11)

“Self-service storage facility” means real property used for renting or leasing leased space in which an occupant stores and removes personal property on a self-service basis.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 576, § 1; 2013, No. 364, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

18-16-402. Operator's lien on stored property.

(a)(1)

An operator of a self-service storage facility has a lien on all personal property stored within each leased space for rent, labor, or other charges and for expenses reasonably incurred in its sale or removal from a self-service storage facility under this subchapter.

(2)

If the personal property is a motor vehicle, trailer, or watercraft, the lien shall include fees and expenses reasonably incurred by an operator to remove the personal property from a self-service storage facility under this subchapter.

(b)

The lien provided for in this section attaches as of the date the personal property is brought to the self-service storage facility and shall be superior to any other lien or security interest except the following:

(1)

A lien which is perfected and recorded in Arkansas in the name of the occupant, either in the county of the occupant's last known address or in the county where the self-service storage facility is located, prior to the date of the rental agreement;

(2)

Any tax lien; and

(3)

Any lienholder with a perfected security interest in the property.

(c)

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to prohibit the occupant, operator, lienholder, or any other person or entity claiming an interest in the property stored in the leased space from applying to a court of competent jurisdiction to determine the validity of the lien or its priority.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 576, §§ 3, 7; 2015, No. 348, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment redesignated (a) as (a)(1) and added (a)(2); in (a)(1), substituted “An” for “The”, inserted “or removal from a self-service storage facility” and substituted “under” for “as provided in”.

18-16-403. Use for residential purposes.

(a)

An operator may not knowingly permit a leased space at a self-service storage facility to be used for residential purposes.

(b)

An occupant may not use a leased space for residential purposes.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 576, § 2.

18-16-404. Notice of lien.

A rental agreement shall contain a statement in bold type advising the occupant:

(1)

Of the existence of the lien; and

(2)

That property stored in the leased space may be sold or removed to satisfy the lien if the occupant is in default.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 576, § 3; 2015, No. 348, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment substituted “A” for “The” in the introductory language; and inserted “or removed” in (2).

18-16-405. Access to leased space — Care of property.

(a)

If an occupant is in default, the operator may deny the occupant access to the leased space.

(b)(1)

The exclusive care, custody, and control of all personal property stored in the leased self-service storage space remains vested in the occupant unless:

(A)

The rental agreement specifically provides otherwise;

(B)

A lien sale is conducted by the operator under this subchapter; or

(C)

The personal property is a motor vehicle, trailer, or watercraft that is removed from the self-service storage facility by an operator of a tow vehicle.

(2)

Entry of the leased space by the operator for the purpose of complying with this subchapter shall not constitute conversion nor impose any responsibility for the care, custody, and control of any of the personal property stored.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 576, §§ 4, 5; 1991, No. 786, § 28; 2015, No. 348, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1987, No. 576, § 6, provided:

“All rental agreements, entered into before the effective date of this act, which have not been extended or renewed after that date, shall remain valid and may be enforced or terminated in accordance with their terms or as permitted by any other statute or law of this state.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 786, § 37, provided:

“The enactment and adoption of this Act shall not repeal, expressly or impliedly, the acts passed at the regular session of the 78th General Assembly. All such acts shall have full effect and, so far as those acts intentionally vary from or conflict with any provision contained in this Act, those acts shall have the effect of subsequent acts and as amending or repealing the appropriate parts of the Arkansas Code of 1987.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment, in (b)(1), deleted “Unless the rental agreement specifically provides otherwise and until a lien sale under this subchapter” at the beginning, and added “unless” at the end; and added (b)(1)(A)-(C).

18-16-406. Default — Right to sell or remove property.

(a)

If the occupant is in default for more than forty-five (45) days, the operator may enforce the lien by selling the personal property stored in the leased space at a public sale for cash.

(b)(1)

If the personal property subject to the lien is a motor vehicle, trailer, or watercraft, and the occupant is in default for at least sixty (60) days, the operator may remove the personal property instead of selling the property under subsection (a) of this section.

(2)

If a motor vehicle, trailer, or watercraft is removed by a towing operator, the operator is not liable for the personal property or any damages to the personal property once the towing operator takes possession of the personal property.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 576, § 4; 2015, No. 348, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted “or remove” in the section heading; redesignated the existing language as (a); in (a), deleted “a period of” following “default for” and inserted “personal” preceding “property”; and added (b).